Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.207

Animal cruelty in the second degree—Penalty.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1149-S.SL) ***

(1) A person is guilty of animal cruelty in the second degree if, under circumstances not amounting to first degree animal cruelty:

(a) The person knowingly, recklessly, or with criminal negligence inflicts unnecessary suffering or pain upon an animal; or

(b) The person takes control, custody, or possession of an animal that was involved in animal fighting as described in RCW 16.52.117 and knowingly, recklessly, or with criminal negligence abandons the animal.

(2) An owner of an animal is guilty of animal cruelty in the second degree if, under circumstances not amounting to first degree animal cruelty, the owner knowingly, recklessly, or with criminal negligence:

(a) Fails to provide the animal with necessary shelter, rest, sanitation, space, or medical attention and the animal suffers unnecessary or unjustifiable physical pain as a result of the failure; or

(b) Abandons the animal.

(3) Animal cruelty in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2020 c 158 s 7; 2019 c 174 s 2; 2011 c 172 s 5; 2007 c 376 s 1; 2005 c 481 s 2; 1994 c 261 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.